Idaho statutes. Title 63 REVENUE AND TAXATION
Chapter 6
EXEMPTIONS FROM TAXATION

Sec.

63-602LL. 63-602MM. [Reserved.]

§ 63-601. All property subject to taxation.

All property within the jurisdiction of this state, not expressly exempted, is subject to assessment and taxation.

§ 63-602. Property exempt from taxation.

Property shall be exempt from taxation as provided in titles 21, 22, 25, 26, 31, 33, 39, 41, 42, 49, 50, 67 and 70, Idaho Code, and in chapters 6, 24, 30, 35 and 45, title 63, Idaho Code; provided, that no deduction shall be made in assessment of shares of capital stock of any corporation or association for exemptions claimed under this section, and provided further, that the term “full cash value” wherever used in this act shall mean the actual assessed value of the property as to which an exemption is claimed.

The use of the word “exclusive” or “exclusively” in this chapter shall mean used exclusively for any one (1) or more, or any combination, of the exempt purposes provided hereunder and property used for more than one (1) exempt purpose, pursuant to the provisions of sections 63-602A through 63-602OO, Idaho Code, shall be exempt from taxation hereunder as long as the property is used exclusively for one (1) or more or any combination of the exempt purposes provided hereunder.

All exemptions from property taxation claimed shall be approved annually by the board of county commissioners or unless otherwise provided:

Exemptions pursuant to sections 63-602A, 63-602F, 63-602I, 63-602J, 63-602L(1), 63-602M, 63-602R, 63-602S, 63-602U, 63-602V, 63-602W, 63-602Z, 63-602DD(1), 63-602EE, 63-602OO, 63-2431, 63-3502, 63-3502A and 63-3502B, Idaho Code, do not require application or approval by the board of county commissioners. For all other exemptions in title 63, Idaho Code, the process of applying is as specified in the exemption statutes or, if no process is specified and application is necessary to identify the property eligible for the exemption, annual application is required. Exemptions in other titles require no application.

For exemptions that require an application, provided such exemptions are for property otherwise subject to assessment by the county assessor, the application must be made to the county commissioners by April 15 and the taxpayer and county assessor must be notified of any decision by May 15, unless otherwise provided by law. The decision of the county commissioners and any subsequent assessment notices sent to the taxpayer may be appealed to the county board of equalization pursuant to sections 63-501 and 63-501A, Idaho Code.

For exemptions that require an application, provided such exemptions are for property otherwise subject to assessment by the state tax commission, application for exemption shall be included with the annual operator’s statement as required pursuant to section 63-404, Idaho Code. Notice of the decision and its effect on the assessment will be provided in accordance with procedures specified in chapter 4, title 63, Idaho Code. Appeals shall be made to the state tax commission in accordance with section 63-407, Idaho Code.

An owner of property that is intended for a tax-exempt purpose may apply to the board of county commissioners for a provisional property tax exemption, pursuant to section 63-1305C, Idaho Code.

§ 63-602A. Property exempt from taxation — Government property.

The following property is exempt from taxation: property belonging to the United States, except when taxation thereof is authorized by the congress of the United States; property belonging to the state of Idaho; property belonging to a federally recognized Indian tribe, as defined in section 67-4001, Idaho Code, which property is situated within the boundaries of the reservation of the Indian tribe; and property belonging to any county or municipal corporation or school district within this state.

However, inventory property acquired under agricultural credit programs of the consolidated farm service agency of the United States department of agriculture shall be subject to taxation as other property in the county.

However, unimproved real property of more than ten (10) contiguous acres owned in fee simple by the department of fish and game shall be subject to a fee in lieu of property taxes contingent upon the following conditions and requirements:

The fee in lieu of property taxes shall not exceed the property tax for the property at the time of acquisition by the department of fish and game, unless the property tax rate for the property shall have been increased.

The department shall determine and identify the parcels of property and their current use as qualified under the provisions of this chapter. The department shall consult with the appropriate county treasurer and determine the fee to be paid on the property and credited continuously to the county current expense fund. The fee shall be an amount equal to the property tax the property would generate if assessed as agricultural property.

Any future increase in the fee paid in lieu of property taxes shall be determined by the amount of property taxes the property would generate if assessed as agricultural property. The increase may be determined by the department working cooperatively with the appropriate county assessor. The method used for determining the fee that would be due on department property is to be used only under this subsection and has no other application in any other section of the Idaho Code.

The department shall then provide to the assessor of the county where the parcels are located on or before the second Monday of March each year, a listing identifying each parcel of unimproved property by legal description, size and amount of the fee for the preceding calendar year. The treasurer shall prepare and submit a billing for payment based on this information to the department. Once the fee has been determined, payment shall be made by June 20 of that year from moneys appropriated for that purpose. However, if the fees exceed the moneys appropriated for that purpose, the director of the department of fish and game shall calculate the percent reduction that must be made and certify the proportionate reduction to each county treasurer.

§ 63-602B. Property exempt from taxation — Religious limited liability companies, corporations or societies.

The following property is exempt from taxation: property belonging to any religious limited liability company, corporation or society of this state, used exclusively for and in connection with any combination of religious, educational, or recreational purposes or activities of such religious limited liability company, corporation or society, including any and all residences used for or in furtherance of such purposes.

If the entirety of any property belonging to any such religious limited liability company, corporation or society is leased by such owner, or if such religious limited liability company, corporation or society uses the entirety of such property for business or commercial purposes from which a revenue is derived, then the same shall be assessed and taxed as any other property. If any such property is leased in part or used in part by such religious limited liability company, corporation or society for such business or commercial purposes, the assessor shall determine the value of the entire exempt property, and the value of the part used or leased for such business or commercial purposes, and that part used or leased for such business or commercial purposes shall be taxed as any other property. The Idaho state tax commission shall promulgate rules establishing a method of determining the value of the part used or leased for such business or commercial purposes. If the value of the part used or leased for such business or commercial purposes is determined to be three percent (3%) or less of the value of the entirety, the whole of said property shall remain exempt. If the value of the part used or leased for such business or commercial purposes is determined to be more than three percent (3%) of the value of the entirety, the assessor shall assess such proportionate part of such property, and shall assess the trade fixtures used in connection with the sale of all merchandise for such business or commercial purposes, provided however, that the use or lease of any property by any such religious limited liability company, corporation or society for athletic or recreational facilities, residence halls or dormitories, meeting rooms or halls, auditoriums, or club rooms for and in connection with the purposes for which such religious limited liability company, corporation or society is organized, shall not be deemed a business or commercial purpose, even though fees or charges be imposed and revenue derived therefrom.

§ 63-602C. Property exempt from taxation — Fraternal, benevolent, or charitable limited liability companies, corporations or societies.

The following property is exempt from taxation: property belonging to any fraternal, benevolent, or charitable limited liability company, corporation or society, the World War veteran organization buildings and memorials of this state, used exclusively for the purposes for which such limited liability company, corporation or society is organized; provided, that if any building or property belonging to any such limited liability company, corporation or society is leased by such owner or if such limited liability company, corporation or society uses such property for business purposes from which a revenue is derived which, in the case of a charitable organization, is not directly related to the charitable purposes for which such charitable organization exists, then the same shall be assessed and taxed as any other property, and if any such property is leased in part or used in part by such limited liability company, corporation or society for such purposes the assessor shall determine the value of the entire building and the value of the part used or leased for commercial purposes. If the value of the part used for commercial purposes is determined to be three percent (3%) or less than the value of the entirety, the whole of said property shall remain exempt. If the value of the part used for commercial purposes is determined to be more than three percent (3%) of the value of the entirety, the assessor shall assess such proportionate part of such building including the value of the real estate as is so leased or used for such purposes, and shall assess the trade fixtures used in connection with the sale of all merchandise; provided however, that the lease or use of any property by any such limited liability company, corporation or society for athletic or recreational facilities, residence halls or dormitories, meeting rooms or halls, auditoriums or club rooms within the purposes for which such limited liability company, corporation or society is organized, shall not be deemed a business or commercial purpose, even though fees or charges be imposed and revenue derived therefrom.

§ 63-602D. Property exempt from taxation — Certain hospitals.

For the purposes of this section, “hospital” means a hospital as defined by chapter 13, title 39, Idaho Code, and includes one (1) or more acute care, outreach, satellite, outpatient, ancillary or support facilities of such hospital whether or not any such individual facility would independently satisfy the definition of hospital.

The following property is exempt from taxation: the real property owned and personal property, including medical equipment, owned or leased by a hospital corporation or a county hospital or hospital district that is operated as a hospital and the necessary grounds used therewith.

If real property, not currently exempt from taxation, is being prepared for use as a hospital, the value of the bare land only shall be taxed while the property is being prepared for use as a hospital. All improvements to and construction on the real property, while it is being prepared for use as a hospital, shall be exempt from taxation. For purposes of this section, property is being “prepared for use as a hospital” if the corporation has begun construction of a hospital project as evidenced by obtaining a building permit that will, on completion, qualify such property for an exemption and, as of the assessment date, has not abandoned the construction. Construction shall not be considered abandoned if it has been delayed by causes and circumstances beyond the corporation’s control or when delay is caused by an event that has occurred in the absence of the corporation’s willful neglect or intentional acts, omissions or practices engaged in by the corporation for the purpose of impeding progress. Notwithstanding the foregoing, in no event shall improvements to property that is being prepared for use as a hospital qualify for an exemption from ad valorem property tax under this subsection for more than three (3) consecutive tax years; upon completion of construction and obtaining a certificate of occupancy, the entire real property shall be exempt from taxation if the corporation meets the requirements of subsection (4) of this section; provided, property already exempt or eligible for exemption shall not be affected by the provisions of this subsection.

The corporation must show that the hospital:

Is organized as a nonprofit corporation pursuant to chapter 30, title 30, Idaho Code, or pursuant to equivalent laws in its state of incorporation;

Has received an exemption from taxation from the internal revenue service pursuant to section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code.

The board of equalization shall grant an exemption to the property of: (a) a county hospital; (b) a hospital district; or (c) any hospital corporation meeting the criteria provided in subsection (4) of this section.

If a hospital corporation uses property for business purposes from which a revenue is derived that is not directly related to the hospital corporation’s exempt purposes, then the property shall be assessed and taxed as any other property. If property is used in part by a hospital corporation for such purposes, then the assessor shall determine the value of the entire property and the value of the part used that is not directly related to the hospital corporation’s exempt purposes. If the value of the part that is not directly related to the hospital corporation’s exempt purposes is determined to be three percent (3%) or less than the value of the entire property, then the property shall remain exempt. If the value of the part that is not directly related to the hospital corporation’s exempt purposes is determined to be more than three percent (3%) of the value of the entire property, then the assessor shall assess the proportionate part of the property, including the value of the real estate used for such purposes.
(7) A hospital corporation issued an exemption from property taxation pursuant to this section and operating a hospital having one hundred fifty (150) or more patient beds shall prepare a community benefits report to be filed with the board of equalization by December 31 of each year. The report shall itemize the hospital’s amount of unreimbursed services for the prior year (including charity care, bad debt, and underreimbursed care covered through government programs); special services and programs the hospital provides below its actual cost; donated time, funds, subsidies and in-kind services; additions to capital such as physical plant and equipment; and indication of the process the hospital has used to determine general community needs that coincide with the hospital’s mission. The report shall be provided as a matter of community information. Neither the submission of the report nor the contents shall be a basis for the approval or denial of a corporation’s property tax exemption.

§ 63-602E. Property exempt from taxation — Property used for school or educational purposes.

The following property is exempt from taxation: all property used exclusively for nonprofit school or educational purposes, property used for charter school purposes, and all property from which no profit is derived and which is held or used exclusively for endowment, building or maintenance purposes of schools or educational institutions.

If property is used primarily for nonprofit school purposes or charter school purposes and for business purposes from which a revenue is derived, which revenue is not related to the educational purpose for which the nonprofit school or charter school exists, the assessor shall determine the value of the entire property, of the part used for nonprofit school purposes or charter school purposes, and of the part used for such unrelated business purposes. The portion of the building used for nonprofit school purposes or charter school purposes and for business and administration of the nonprofit school or charter school shall be exempt from taxation.

Possessory interests in improvements on state college or state university owned land used exclusively for student housing, college or university operated dining, or other education related purposes approved by the state board of education and board of regents of the university of Idaho as proper for the operation of such state college or university shall be exempt from taxation.

§ 63-602F. Property exempt from taxation.

The following property is exempt from taxation:

Possessory rights to public lands;

Mining claims not patented;

All public cemeteries;

All public libraries.

§ 63-602G. Property exempt from taxation — Homestead. [Effective until January 1, 2021.]

For each tax year, the first one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) of the market value for assessment purposes of the homestead as that term is defined in section 63-701, Idaho Code, or fifty percent (50%) of the market value for assessment purposes of the homestead as that term is defined in section 63-701, Idaho Code, whichever is the lesser, shall be exempt from property taxation.

The exemption allowed by this section may be granted only if:

The homestead is owner-occupied and used as the primary dwelling place of the owner as of January 1, provided that in the event the homestead is owner-occupied after January 1 but before April 15, the owner of the property is entitled to the exemption. The homestead may consist of part of a multidwelling or multipurpose building and shall include all of such dwelling or building except any portion used exclusively for anything other than the primary dwelling of the owner. The presence of an office in a homestead, which office is used for multiple purposes, including business and personal use, shall not prevent the owner from claiming the exemption provided in this section; and

The state tax commission has certified to the board of county commissioners that all properties in the county which are subject to appraisal by the county assessor have, in fact, been appraised uniformly so as to secure a just valuation for all property within the county; and

The owner has certified to the county assessor by April 15 that:

He is making application for the exemption allowed by this section;

The homestead is his primary dwelling place; and

He has not made application in any other county for the exemption, and has not made application for the exemption on any other homestead in the county.

For the purpose of this section, the definition of “owner” shall be the same definition set forth in section 63-701(7), Idaho Code.

Any owner may request in writing the return of all copies of any documents submitted with the affidavit set forth in section 63-703(4), Idaho Code, that are held by a county assessor, and the copies shall be returned by the county assessor upon submission of the affidavit in proper form.

For the purpose of this section, the definition of “primary dwelling place” shall be the same definition set forth in section 63-701(8), Idaho Code.

For the purpose of this section, the definition of “occupied” shall be the same definition set forth in section 63-701(6), Idaho Code.

An owner need only make application for the exemption described in subsection (1) of this section once, as long as all of the following conditions are met:

The owner has received the exemption during the previous year as a result of his making a valid application as defined in subsection (2)(c) of this section.

The owner or beneficiary, partner, member or shareholder, as appropriate, still occupies the same homestead for which the owner made application.

The homestead described in subsection (3)(b) of this section is owner-occupied or occupied by a beneficiary, partner, member or shareholder, as appropriate, and used as the primary dwelling place of the owner or beneficiary, partner, member or shareholder, as appropriate, as of January 1; provided however, that in the event the homestead is owner-occupied after January 1, but before April 15, the owner of the property is entitled to the exemption.

The exemption allowed by this section must be taken before the reduction in taxes provided by sections 63-701 through 63-710, Idaho Code, is applied.

Recovery of property tax exemptions allowed by this section but improperly claimed or approved:

Upon discovery of evidence, facts or circumstances indicating any exemption allowed by this section was improperly claimed or approved, the county assessor shall decide whether the exemption claimed should have been allowed, and if not, notify the taxpayer in writing, assess a recovery of property tax and notify the county treasurer of this assessment. If the county assessor determined that an exemption was improperly approved as a result of county error, the county assessor shall present the discovered evidence, facts or circumstances from the improperly approved exemption to the board of county commissioners, at which time the board may waive a recovery of the property tax and notify such taxpayer in writing.

When information indicating that an improper claim for the exemption allowed by this section is discovered by the state tax commission, the state tax commission may disclose this information to the appropriate county assessor, board of county commissioners and county treasurer. Information disclosed to county officials by the state tax commission under this subsection may be used to decide the validity of any entitlement to the exemption provided in this section and is not otherwise subject to public disclosure pursuant to chapter 1, title 74, Idaho Code.

The assessment and collection of the recovery of property tax must begin within the seven (7) year period beginning the date the assessment notice reflecting the improperly claimed or approved exemption was required to be mailed to the taxpayer.

The taxpayer may appeal to the county board of equalization the decision by the county assessor to assess the recovery of property tax within thirty (30) days of the date the county assessor sent the notice to the taxpayer pursuant to this section. The board may waive the collection of all or part of any costs, late charges and interest, in order to facilitate the collection of the recovery of the property tax.

For purposes of calculating the tax, the amount of the recovered property tax shall be for each year the exemption allowed by this section was improperly claimed or approved, up to a maximum of seven (7) years. The amount of the recovery of property tax shall be calculated using the product of the amount of exempted value for each year multiplied by the levy for that year plus costs, late charges and interest for each year at the rates equal to those provided for delinquent property taxes during that year.

Any recovery of property tax shall be due and payable no later than the date provided for property taxes in section 63-903, Idaho Code, and if not timely paid, late charges and interest, beginning the first day of January in the year following the year the county assessor sent the notice to the taxpayer pursuant to this section, shall be calculated at the current rate provided for property taxes.

Recovered property taxes shall be billed, collected and distributed in the same manner as property taxes, except each taxing district or unit shall be notified of the amount of any recovered property taxes included in any distribution.

Thirty (30) days after the taxpayer is notified, as provided in subsection (5)(a) of this section, the assessor shall record a notice of intent to attach a lien. Upon the payment in full of such recovered property taxes prior to the attachment of the lien as provided in subsection (5)(i) of this section, or upon the successful appeal by the taxpayer, the county assessor shall record a rescission of the intent to attach a lien within seven (7) business days of receiving such payment or within seven (7) business days of the county board of equalization decision granting the appeal. If the real property is sold to a bona fide purchaser for value, prior to the recording of the notice of the intent to attach a lien, the county assessor and treasurer shall cease the recovery of such unpaid recovered property tax.

Any unpaid recovered property taxes shall become a lien upon the real property in the same manner as provided for property taxes in section 63-206, Idaho Code, except such lien shall attach as of the first day of January in the year following the year the county assessor sent the notice to the taxpayer pursuant to this section.

For purposes of the limitation provided by section 63-802, Idaho Code, moneys received pursuant to this subsection as recovery of property tax shall be treated as property tax revenue.

The legislature declares that this exemption is necessary and just.

A homestead, having previously qualified for exemption under this section in the preceding year, shall not lose such qualification due to: the owner’s, beneficiary’s, partner’s, member’s or shareholder’s absence in the current year by reason of active military service, or because the homestead has been leased because the owner, beneficiary, partner, member or shareholder is absent in the current year by reason of active military service. An owner subject to the provisions of this subsection must apply for the exemption with the county assessor every year on or before a deadline date as specified by the county assessor for the county in which the homestead is claimed. If an owner fails to apply on or before the established deadline, the county may, at its discretion, discontinue the exemption for that year.

A homestead, having previously qualified for exemption under this section in the preceding year, shall not lose such qualification due to the owner’s, beneficiary’s, partner’s, member’s or shareholder’s death during the year of the owner’s, beneficiary’s, partner’s, member’s or shareholder’s death and the tax year immediately following such death provided that the homestead continues to be a part of the owner’s, beneficiary’s, partner’s, member’s or shareholder’s estate. After such time the new owner shall reapply to receive the exemption pursuant to this section and shall meet the qualification criteria contained in this section.

When an “owner,” pursuant to the provisions of section 63-701(7), Idaho Code, is any person who is the beneficiary of a revocable or irrevocable trust, or who is a partner of a limited partnership, a member of a limited liability company, or shareholder of a corporation, he or she may provide proof of the trust, limited partnership, limited liability company, or corporation in the manner set forth in section 63-703(4), Idaho Code.

§ 63-602G. Property exempt from taxation — Homestead. [Effective January 1, 2021.]

For each tax year, the first one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) of the market value for assessment purposes of the homestead as that term is defined in section 63-701, Idaho Code, or fifty percent (50%) of the market value for assessment purposes of the homestead as that term is defined in section 63-701, Idaho Code, whichever is the lesser, shall be exempt from property taxation.

The exemption allowed by this section may be granted only if:

The homestead is owner-occupied and used as the primary dwelling place of the owner. The homestead may consist of part of a multidwelling or multipurpose building and shall include all of such dwelling or building except any portion used exclusively for anything other than the primary dwelling of the owner. The presence of an office in a homestead, which office is used for multiple purposes, including business and personal use, shall not prevent the owner from claiming the exemption provided in this section; and

The state tax commission has certified to the board of county commissioners that all properties in the county which are subject to appraisal by the county assessor have, in fact, been appraised uniformly so as to secure a just valuation for all property within the county; and

The owner has certified to the county assessor that:

He is making application for the exemption allowed by this section;

The homestead is his primary dwelling place; and

He has not made application in any other county for the exemption, and has not made application for the exemption on any other homestead in the county.

For the purpose of this section, the definition of “owner” shall be the same definition set forth in section 63-701(7), Idaho Code.

Any owner may request in writing the return of all copies of any documents submitted with the affidavit set forth in section 63-703(4), Idaho Code, that are held by a county assessor, and the copies shall be returned by the county assessor upon submission of the affidavit in proper form.

For the purpose of this section, the definition of “primary dwelling place” shall be the same definition set forth in section 63-701(8), Idaho Code.

For the purpose of this section, the definition of “occupied” shall be the same definition set forth in section 63-701(6), Idaho Code.

An owner need only make application for the exemption described in subsection (1) of this section once, as long as all of the following conditions are met:

The owner has received the exemption during the previous year as a result of his making a valid application as set forth in subsection (2)(c) of this section.

The owner or beneficiary, partner, member or shareholder, as appropriate, still occupies the same homestead for which the owner made application.
(c) The homestead described in paragraph (b) of this subsection is owner-occupied or occupied by a beneficiary, partner, member or shareholder, as appropriate, and used as the primary dwelling place of the owner or beneficiary, partner, member or shareholder, as appropriate.

The exemption allowed by this section shall be effective upon the date of the application and must be taken before the reduction in taxes provided by sections 63-701 through 63-710, Idaho Code, is applied.

Recovery of property tax exemptions allowed by this section but improperly claimed or approved:

Upon discovery of evidence, facts or circumstances indicating any exemption allowed by this section was improperly claimed or approved, the county assessor shall decide whether the exemption claimed should have been allowed and, if not, notify the taxpayer in writing, assess a recovery of property tax and notify the county treasurer of this assessment. If the county assessor determined that an exemption was improperly approved as a result of county error, the county assessor shall present the discovered evidence, facts or circumstances from the improperly approved exemption to the board of county commissioners, at which time the board may waive a recovery of the property tax and notify such taxpayer in writing.

When information indicating that an improper claim for the exemption allowed by this section is discovered by the state tax commission, the state tax commission may disclose this information to the appropriate county assessor, board of county commissioners and county treasurer. Information disclosed to county officials by the state tax commission under this subsection may be used to decide the validity of any entitlement to the exemption provided in this section and is not otherwise subject to public disclosure pursuant to chapter 1, title 74, Idaho Code.

The assessment and collection of the recovery of property tax must begin within the seven (7) year period beginning the date the assessment notice reflecting the improperly claimed or approved exemption was required to be mailed to the taxpayer.

The taxpayer may appeal to the county board of equalization the decision by the county assessor to assess the recovery of property tax within thirty (30) days of the date the county assessor sent the notice to the taxpayer pursuant to this section. The board may waive the collection of all or part of any costs, late charges, and interest in order to facilitate the collection of the recovery of the property tax.

For purposes of calculating the tax, the amount of the recovered property tax shall be for each year the exemption allowed by this section was improperly claimed or approved, up to a maximum of seven (7) years. The amount of the recovery of property tax shall be calculated using the product of the amount of exempted value for each year multiplied by the levy for that year plus costs, late charges and interest for each year at the rates equal to those provided for delinquent property taxes during that year.

Any recovery of property tax shall be due and payable no later than the date provided for property taxes in section 63-903, Idaho Code, and if not timely paid, late charges and interest, beginning the first day of January in the year following the year the county assessor sent the notice to the taxpayer pursuant to this section, shall be calculated at the current rate provided for property taxes.

Recovered property taxes shall be billed, collected and distributed in the same manner as property taxes, except each taxing district or unit shall be notified of the amount of any recovered property taxes included in any distribution.
(h) Thirty (30) days after the taxpayer is notified, as provided in paragraph (a) of this subsection, the assessor shall record a notice of intent to attach a lien. Upon the payment in full of such recovered property taxes prior to the attachment of the lien as provided in paragraph (i) of this subsection, or upon the successful appeal by the taxpayer, the county assessor shall record a rescission of the intent to attach a lien within seven (7) business days of receiving such payment or within seven (7) business days of the county board of equalization decision granting the appeal. If the real property is sold to a bona fide purchaser for value prior to the recording of the notice of the intent to attach a lien, the county assessor and treasurer shall cease the recovery of such unpaid recovered property tax.

Any unpaid recovered property taxes shall become a lien upon the real property in the same manner as provided for property taxes in section 63-206, Idaho Code, except such lien shall attach as of the first day of January in the year following the year the county assessor sent the notice to the taxpayer pursuant to this section.

The legislature declares that this exemption is necessary and just.

A homestead, having previously qualified for exemption under this section in the preceding year, shall not lose such qualification due to: the owner’s, beneficiary’s, partner’s, member’s or shareholder’s absence in the current year by reason of active military service, or because the homestead has been leased because the owner, beneficiary, partner, member or shareholder is absent in the current year by reason of active military service. An owner subject to the provisions of this subsection must apply for the exemption with the county assessor every year on or before a deadline date as specified by the county assessor for the county in which the homestead is claimed. If an owner fails to apply on or before the established deadline, the county may, at its discretion, discontinue the exemption for that year.

A homestead, having previously qualified for exemption under this section in the preceding year, shall not lose such qualification due to the owner’s, beneficiary’s, partner’s, member’s or shareholder’s death during the year of the owner’s, beneficiary’s, partner’s, member’s or shareholder’s death and the tax year immediately following such death provided that the homestead continues to be a part of the owner’s, beneficiary’s, partner’s, member’s or shareholder’s estate. After such time, the new owner shall reapply to receive the exemption pursuant to this section and shall meet the qualification criteria contained in this section.

When an “owner,” pursuant to the provisions of section 63-701(7), Idaho Code, is any person who is the beneficiary of a revocable or irrevocable trust, or who is a partner of a limited partnership, a member of a limited liability company, or shareholder of a corporation, he or she may provide proof of the trust, limited partnership, limited liability company, or corporation in the manner set forth in section 63-703(4), Idaho Code.

(j) For purposes of the limitation provided by section 63-802, Idaho Code, moneys received pursuant to this subsection as recovery of property tax shall be treated as property tax revenue.

§ 63-602H. Value of residential property in certain zoned areas.

Residential property located in an area which was previously zoned residential but has been changed to a zone other than residential shall be appraised, assessed and taxed as if such property were in an area zoned residential as long as such property is continuously used by the owner thereof solely for residential purposes.

“Residential property” as used herein is defined as any tract of three (3) acres or less which is used by the owner thereof solely for residential purposes.

§ 63-602I. Property exempt from taxation — Household goods, wearing apparel and other personal effects in certain cases.

The following property is exempt from taxation: all household goods, furniture and furnishings actually in use by the owner in his private home or dwelling place, or temporarily in storage pending delivery by a vendor to him for his personal use, and not for sale or in commercial use, and all wearing apparel and other personal effects held by any person for the exclusive use and benefit of himself or family and not for sale or commercial use.

§ 63-602J. Property exempt from taxation — Motor vehicles and vessels properly registered.

The following property is exempt from taxation: motor vehicles properly registered and for which the required fee has been paid under the provisions of the laws of the state of Idaho, recreational vehicles for which the fees imposed by law have been paid and vessels for which the certificate of registration fees imposed by law have been paid.

§ 63-602K. Property exempt from taxation

Speculative portion of value of agricultural land. [Amended and Redesignated.]